Alaska, session 34, HB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 18.80.300(1) is amended to read: 05 (1) "blockbusting" means an unlawful discriminatory practice by a real 06 estate broker, real estate salesperson, or employee or agent of a broker or another 07 individual, corporation, partnership, or organization for the purpose of inducing a real 08 estate transaction from which that [ANY SUCH] person or its stockholders or 09 members may benefit financially, to represent directly or indirectly that a change has 10 occurred or will or may occur from a composition with respect to race, religion, sex, 11 color, or national origin of the owners or occupants of the block, neighborhood, or 12 area in which the real property is located, and to represent directly or indirectly that 13 this change may or will result in undesirable consequences in the block, neighborhood, 14 or area in which the real property is located, including the lowering of property values, 01 an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior, or decline in the quality of the schools 02 or other facilities; 03 * Sec. 2. AS 18.80.300 is amended by adding new paragraphs to read: 04 (19) "gender identity or expression" means having or being perceived 05 as having or expressing a gender, self-image, appearance, or behavior, regardless of 06 whether that gender, self-image, appearance, or behavior is different from that 07 traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth; 08 (20) "sex" includes sexual orientation and gender identity or 09 expression; 10 (21) "sexual orientation" means an actual or perceived inherent 11 attraction, or lack thereof, to a sexual partner of a certain gender, or the absence of 12 gender preference, in a sexual relationship. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.